Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5996.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 157.2
RHODE ISLAND INDIVIDUAL MARKET AFFORDABILITY ACT OF 2025
42-157.2-1. Short title and purpose.
(a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Rhode Island Individual Market
Affordability Act of 2025."
(b) The purpose of this chapter is to create a state affordability program to reduce out-of-
pocket costs for low- and moderate-income consumers enrolled in health insurance coverage
through the Rhode Island health benefits exchange.
42-157.2-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Affordability program" means a program to improve affordability for health care or
health insurance coverage as implemented by the board established by § 42-157.2-6.
(2) "Assessment" means the health insurance affordability assessment established by § 42-
157.2-5.
(3) "Board" means the health insurance affordability board established by § 42-157.2-6.
(4) "Commissioner'' means the commissioner of the office of the health insurance

commissioner.
(5) "Cost-sharing reduction" means the program set forth in 42 U.S.C. § 18071 by which
certain individuals eligible to purchase health insurance coverage through the exchange are entitled
to purchase a plan with an adjusted actuarial value to lower out-of-pocket expenses.
(6) "Director" means the director of the Rhode Island health benefits exchange.
(7) "Exchange" means the Rhode Island health benefits exchange established within the
department of administration by § 42-157-1.
(8) "Federal poverty line" has the same meaning as "poverty line" as set forth in 42 U.S.C.
§ 9902(2).
(9) "Health insurance carrier" or "carrier'' has the same meaning as set forth in § 27-18.5-
2.
(10) "Health insurance coverage" has the same meaning as set forth in § 27-18.5-2.
(11) "Household income" has the same meaning as set forth in 26 U.S.C. § 36B(d)(2) in
effect as of January 1, 2025.
(12) "Individual market" has the same meaning as set forth in § 27-18.5-2.
(13) "Office of the health insurance commissioner" means the entity established by § 42-
14.5-1 within the department of business regulation.
(14) "Premium assistance credit amount" has the same meaning as set forth in § 26 USC
36(b)(1), effective January 1, 2025.
(15) "Premium tax credit" means the refundable tax credit available, pursuant to federal
law, to assist certain individuals in purchasing health insurance coverage through the exchange.
(16) "Program" means the individual market affordability program established by § 42-
157.2-3.
(17) "Program fund" or "fund" means the fund established by § 42-157.2-4.
(18) "State" means the State of Rhode Island.
42-157.2-3. Establishment of the Rhode Island individual market affordability
program.
(a) The director is authorized to establish a state-based affordability program, to be known
as the Rhode Island individual market affordability program:
(1) To provide for improved affordability for individuals who purchase health insurance
coverage through the exchange; and
(2) That is consistent with state and federal law.
(b) The program is intended to mitigate the impact of high and rising healthcare costs for
low- and middle-income Rhode Islanders who purchase health insurance coverage through the
LC001839 - Page 2 of 13

exchange by reducing out-of-pocket costs through expanded affordability programs.
(c) The director is authorized, based on recommendations advanced by the board, to
implement affordability programs and direct payment to carriers to reduce the cost of health
insurance coverage purchased through the exchange, and to improve the actuarial value of health
insurance coverage, for individuals determined eligible for state-based subsidies.
(d) In addition to the funding contribution established by § 42-157.2-4, the director, in
consultation with the commissioner, the secretary of the executive office of health and human
services, and the Medicaid director, shall collaborate to identify any federal or other external
sources of funding for the program, including funding available through the state's existing section
1115 Medicaid demonstration waiver, the state's existing section 1332 state innovation waiver, or
new funding available under those authorities or any other authority.
(1) The director is authorized to apply for and obtain any available identified funding for
the program.
(2) The secretary of the executive office of health and human services is authorized to apply
for, submit, and negotiate any necessary changes to the Medicaid state plan, the state section 1115
Medicaid demonstration waiver, or any other necessary authorities in order to facilitate the
obtaining of identified funding for the program.
42-157.2-4. Establishment of program fund.
(a) There is created within the general fund a restricted receipt account to be known as the
“health insurance individual market affordability account”. All money in the account shall be
utilized by the exchange to effectuate the provisions of § 42-157.2-3. All money received pursuant
to this section shall be deposited into the health insurance individual market affordability account.
Funding dedicated exclusively to effectuate the provisions of § 42-157.2-3 and this subsection
received by the exchange from sources other than those identified in this section may also be
deposited in the health insurance individual market affordability account. The general treasurer is
authorized and directed to draw the general treasurer's orders on the account upon receipt of
properly authenticated vouchers from the exchange.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2025, a portion of the amount collected pursuant to § 42-7.4-3, up to
the actual amount expended or projected to be expended for the state for the services described in
subsection (a) of this section, less any amount collected in excess of the prior year’s funding
requirement as indicated in subsection (c) of this section, shall be deposited in the health insurance
individual market affordability account. The funds shall be used solely for the purposes of the
health insurance individual market affordability account, and no other.
(c) The exchange shall submit to the general assembly an annual report on the program and
LC001839 - Page 3 of 13

costs related to the program, on or before February 1 of each year. The exchange shall make
available to any entity making a contribution pursuant to § 42-7.4-3, upon its request, detailed
information regarding the health insurance individual market affordability program described in
subsection (a) of this section and the costs related to those programs. Any funds collected in excess
of funds needed to carry out the programs shall be deducted from the subsequent year’s funding
requirements.
(d) The health insurance individual market affordability account shall be exempt from the
indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27.
(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as obligating the state to make general
revenue appropriations to support the state affordability program.
42-157.2-5. Utilization of program fund -- Affordability programs.
(a) The director shall allocate the program fund, pursuant to regulations adopted under this
chapter:
(1) To provide payments to carriers to increase the affordability of health insurance on the
individual market for individuals who receive federal premium tax credits in the form of
supplemental state premium tax credits;
(2) To provide payments to carriers to increase the affordability of health insurance on the
individual market for individuals who are over the household income limit, as established by federal
law, for federal premium tax credits in the form of state premium tax credits;
(3) To provide subsidies to reduce cost sharing for individuals enrolled in health insurance
coverage through the exchange who are determined eligible for state subsidies; and
(4) To pay for the actual administrative costs for implementing and administering the
program established under this chapter. These actual administrative costs include the following:
(i) The costs to implement the market affordability board established by § 42-157.2-6;
(ii) The actual costs related to implementing and maintaining the program fund established
by § 42-157.2-4;
(iii) The costs for conducting analyses necessary to determine the payments to be made to
carriers for the purposes described in subsections (a)(l), (a)(2), and (a)(3) of this section; and
(iv) Any other costs which accrue to the state traceable to the operation of this program.
(b) The program fund shall be allocated as the director, pursuant to recommendations
established by the board, determines is best in the interest of advancing consumer affordability,
with the following limitations:
(1) For the coverage year beginning January 1, 2026, the director shall rely upon the
recommendations advanced by the marketplace coverage affordability work group and summarized
LC001839 - Page 4 of 13

in the report delivered to the general assembly entitled “coverage at risk: state actions to keep Rhode
Islanders covered” and shall make allocations of the program fund accordingly;
(2) In establishing the amount of the program fund:
(i) For the year beginning January 1, 2026, and so long as federal premium tax credits
remain in place that are no less generous than the federal premium tax credits utilizing the
applicable percentages of household income established in the version of 26 U.S.C. 36B(b)(3)(A)(i)
in effect on January 1, 2025, the director shall set a total funding amount equal to the greater of:
(A) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000); or
(B) An amount necessary to provide state premium tax credits to enrollees which shall
provide a total premium assistance credit amount for each enrollee, including both federal and state
premium tax credits, which sets an applicable percentage utilizing the following income tier table
in lieu of the income table established in 26 U.S.C. 36B(b)(3)(A)(i):
In the case of household income The initial premium The final premium
(expressed as a percent of the percentage is: percentage is:
Federal Poverty Line) within
the following income tier:
Up to 150.0 percent 0.0 0.0
150.0 percent up to 200.0 percent 0.0 2.0
200.0 percent up to 250.0 percent 2.0 4.0
250.0 percent up to 300.0 percent 4.0 6.0
300.0 percent up to 400.0 percent 6.0 8.5
400.0 percent and higher 8.5 8.5
(ii) For the year beginning January 1, 2026, if the federal premium tax credits in place are
less generous than those that would exist utilizing the applicable percentages established in the
version of 26 U.S.C. 36B(b)(3)(A)(i) in effect on January 1, 2025, the director shall set a total
funding amount no lower than forty million dollars ($40,000,000).
(iii) For subsequent years, the director shall set a total funding amount informed by the
recommendations of the board established in § 42-157.2-6, but shall not recommend a year-over-
year reduction in the total funding amount for the program unless accompanied by a report to the
general assembly communicating the decrease along with an explanation of why such a reduction
would align with the goal of improved affordability in the individual market.
42-157.2-6. Individual market affordability board.
(a) There is hereby created the individual market affordability board, which is responsible
for issuing recommendations to the director for the specific terms of the affordability programs
LC001839 - Page 5 of 13

established in § 42-157.2-5.
(b) The board shall consist of the following voting members:
(1) The director of the exchange or designee;
(2) The commissioner of the office of the health insurance commissioner or designee;
(3) Eleven (11) additional members as follows:
(i) One member employed by a health insurance carrier;
(ii) One member who is a representative of a statewide association of health benefit plans;
(iii) One member representing primary care healthcare providers who does not represent a
health insurance carrier;
(iv) One member who represents a healthcare advocacy organization;
(v) One member who is a representative of a business that purchases or otherwise provides
health insurance coverage for its employees;
(vi) One member who represents a hospital;
(vii) Five (5) members who are consumers of healthcare who are not representatives or
employees of a hospital, health insurance carrier, or other healthcare industry entity. To the extent
possible, the governor shall ensure that the consumer members of the board are individuals who
lack affordable offers of coverage from their employers and who otherwise struggle to afford to
purchase health insurance or who struggle to afford to pay for their healthcare.
(c) The members under subsection (b)(3) of this section shall be appointed by the governor
and submitted by the governor to the senate, who may within twelve (12) legislative days confirm
or reject that appointment. If the senate shall fail for twelve (12) legislative days after the
submission to confirm the appointment, the governor shall submit another appointment and so on
in like manner until the senate shall confirm the person named by the governor; however, terms of
current members of the board of review shall not be altered by this chapter.
(d) To the extent possible, the governor shall attempt to appoint board members who reflect
the diversity of the state with regard to race, ethnicity, immigration status, income, wealth,
disability, and geography.
(e) The term of office of the members of the board appointed by the governor is four (4)
years, and those members may serve no more than two (2) four-year (4) terms.
(f) In order to ensure staggered terms of office, the initial terms of office of the members
of the board are:
(1) Two (2) years for the members appointed pursuant to subsections (b)(3)(i), (b)(3)(iii),
and (b)(3)(v) of this section and for three (3) of the members appointed pursuant to subsection
(b)(3)(vii) of this section; and
LC001839 - Page 6 of 13

(2) Four (4) years for the members appointed pursuant to subsections (b)(3)(ii), (b)(3)(iv),
and (b)(3)(vi) of this section and for two (2) of the members appointed pursuant to subsection
(b)(3)(vii) of this section.
(g) Members of the board appointed by the governor serve at the pleasure of the governor
and may be removed by the governor.
(h) In the case of a vacancy on the board while the senate is in session, the governor shall
appoint a replacement subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. A member who is
so appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term of the member whose
vacancy is being filled.
(i) In the case of a vacancy on the board while the senate is not in session, the governor
shall appoint a replacement who shall hold office until the beginning of the next session of the
senate.
(j) Members of the board may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses, including
any required dependent care and dependent or attendant travel, food, and lodging, while engaged
in the performance of official duties of the board.
(k) The board shall meet as often as necessary to carry out its duties.
(l) The board is authorized to recommend, for approval and establishment by the director
by rule:
(1) The distribution of program fund revenues allocated for carrier payments and for
subsidies in a manner that best improves affordability for subsidized populations;
(2) The parameters, including income limits, for implementing the program and for
identifying subsidized populations, including the appropriate balance between affordability
programs and the most effective method to improve the availability and comprehensiveness of
coverage to serve the goal of improved consumer access to care across all populations:
(m) In formulating recommendations for the year beginning January 1, 2026, the board
shall consider the recommendations advanced by the marketplace coverage affordability work
group and summarized in the report delivered to the general assembly entitled "coverage at risk:
state actions to keep Rhode Islanders covered."
42-157.2-7. Rules and regulations.
(a) The director may promulgate regulations as necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.
(b) In establishing regulations relating to the parameters of the program, the director shall
consider the recommendations of the board and shall explain in writing the reasons for any
deviation from the recommendations of the board.
LC001839 - Page 7 of 13

SECTION 2. Section 35-4-27 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-4 entitled "State Funds"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-4-27. Indirect cost recoveries on restricted receipt accounts.
Indirect cost recoveries of ten percent (10%) of cash receipts shall be transferred from all
restricted-receipt accounts, to be recorded as general revenues in the general fund. However, there
shall be no transfer from cash receipts with restrictions received exclusively: (1) From contributions
from nonprofit charitable organizations; (2) From the assessment of indirect cost-recovery rates on
federal grant funds; or (3) Through transfers from state agencies to the department of administration
for the payment of debt service. These indirect cost recoveries shall be applied to all accounts,
unless prohibited by federal law or regulation, court order, or court settlement. The following
restricted receipt accounts shall not be subject to the provisions of this section:
Executive Office of Health and Human Services
Organ Transplant Fund
HIV Care Grant Drug Rebates
Health System Transformation Project
Rhode Island Statewide Opioid Abatement Account
HCBS Support-ARPA
HCBS Admin Support-ARPA
Department of Human Services
Veterans’ home — Restricted account
Veterans’ home — Resident benefits
Pharmaceutical Rebates Account
Demand Side Management Grants
Veteran’s Cemetery Memorial Fund
Donations — New Veterans’ Home Construction
Department of Health
Pandemic medications and equipment account
Miscellaneous Donations/Grants from Non-Profits
State Loan Repayment Match
Healthcare Information Technology
Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Eleanor Slater non-Medicaid third-party payor account
Hospital Medicare Part D Receipts
RICLAS Group Home Operations
LC001839 - Page 8 of 13

Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
Emergency and public communication access account
Department of Environmental Management
National heritage revolving fund
Environmental response fund II
Underground storage tanks registration fees
De Coppet Estate Fund
Rhode Island Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission
Historic preservation revolving loan fund
Historic Preservation loan fund — Interest revenue
Department of Public Safety
E-911 Uniform Emergency Telephone System
Forfeited property — Retained
Forfeitures — Federal
Forfeited property — Gambling
Donation — Polygraph and Law Enforcement Training
Rhode Island State Firefighter’s League Training Account
Fire Academy Training Fees Account
Attorney General
Forfeiture of property
Federal forfeitures
Attorney General multi-state account
Forfeited property — Gambling
Department of Administration
OER Reconciliation Funding
Health Insurance Individual Market Affordability Account
Health Insurance Market Integrity Fund
RI Health Benefits Exchange
Information Technology restricted receipt account
Restore and replacement — Insurance coverage
Convention Center Authority rental payments
Investment Receipts — TANS
OPEB System Restricted Receipt Account
Car Rental Tax/Surcharge-Warwick Share
LC001839 - Page 9 of 13

Grants Management Administration
RGGI-Executive Climate Change Coordinating Council Projects
Executive Office of Commerce
Housing Resources Commission Restricted Account
Housing Production Fund
Department of Revenue
DMV Modernization Project
Jobs Tax Credit Redemption Fund
Legislature
Audit of federal assisted programs
Department of Children, Youth and Families
Children’s Trust Accounts — SSI
Military Staff
RI Military Family Relief Fund
RI National Guard Counterdrug Program
Treasury
Admin. Expenses — State Retirement System
Retirement — Treasury Investment Options
Defined Contribution — Administration - RR
Violent Crimes Compensation — Refunds
Treasury Research Fellowship
Business Regulation
Banking Division Reimbursement Account
Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner Reimbursement Account
Securities Division Reimbursement Account
Commercial Licensing and Racing and Athletics Division Reimbursement Account
Insurance Division Reimbursement Account
Historic Preservation Tax Credit Account
Marijuana Trust Fund
Social Equity Assistance Fund
Judiciary
Arbitration Fund Restricted Receipt Account
Third-Party Grants
RI Judiciary Technology Surcharge Account
LC001839 - Page 10 of 13

Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Statewide Student Transportation Services Account
School for the Deaf Fee-for-Service Account
School for the Deaf — School Breakfast and Lunch Program
Davies Career and Technical School Local Education Aid Account
Davies — National School Breakfast & Lunch Program
School Construction Services
Office of the Postsecondary Commissioner
Higher Education and Industry Center
IGT STEM Scholarships
Department of Labor and Training
Job Development Fund
Rhode Island Council on the Arts
Governors’ Portrait Donation Fund
Statewide records management system account
SECTION 3. Sections 42-7.4-3 and 42-7.4-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-7.4
entitled "The Healthcare Services Funding Plan Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-7.4-3. Imposition of healthcare services funding contribution. [As amended by P.L.
2024, ch. 423, § 1; See Compiler’s Note.]
(a) Each insurer is required to pay the healthcare services funding contribution for each
contribution enrollee of the insurer at the time the contribution is calculated and paid, at the rate set
forth in this section.
(1) Beginning July 1, 2024, the secretary shall set the healthcare services funding
contribution each fiscal year in an amount equal to: (i) The child immunization funding requirement
described in § 23-1-46; plus (ii) The adult immunization funding requirement described in § 23-1-
46; plus (iii) The children’s health services funding requirement described in § 42-12-29; plus (iv)
The psychiatry resource network funding requirement described in § 23-1-46.1; plus (v) The health
insurance individual market funding requirement described in § 42-157.2-4; and all as divided by;
(v)(vi) The number of contribution enrollees of all insurers.
(2) The contribution set forth herein shall be in addition to any other fees or assessments
upon the insurer allowable by law.
(b) The contribution shall be paid by the insurer; provided, however, a person providing
health benefits coverage on a self-insurance basis that uses the services of a third-party
administrator shall not be required to make a contribution for a contribution enrollee where the
LC001839 - Page 11 of 13

contribution on that enrollee has been or will be made by the third-party administrator.
(c) The secretary shall create a process to facilitate the transition to the healthcare services
funding contribution method that: (i) assures adequate funding beginning July 1, 2016, (ii) reflects
that funding via the healthcare services funding contribution method initially will be for only a
portion of the state’s fiscal year, and (iii) avoids duplicate liability for any insurer that made a
payment under the premium assessment method in effect prior to January 1, 2016, for a period for
which it would also be liable for a contribution under the healthcare services funding contribution
method as described in this chapter.
42-7.4-11. Method of payment and deposit of contribution.
(a) The payments required by this chapter may be made by electronic transfer of monies to
the general treasurer.
(b) The general treasurer shall take all steps necessary to facilitate the transfer of monies
to:
(1) The “childhood immunization account” described in § 23-1-45(a) in the amount
described in § 23-1-46(a);
(2) To the “adult immunization account” described in § 23-1-45(c) in the amount described
in § 23-1-46(a);
(3) To the “children’s health account” described in § 42-12-29(a) in the amount described
in § 42-12-29(b); and
(4) To the “health insurance individual market affordability account” described in § 42-
157.2-4(a) in the amount described in § 42-157.2-4(b); and
(4)(5) Any remainder of the payments shall be proportionally distributed to those accounts
and credited against the next year’s healthcare services funding contribution.
(c) The general treasurer shall provide the secretary with a record of any monies transferred
and deposited.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001839
========
LC001839 - Page 12 of 13